Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 2. Incorporation.
Right of member, officer, agent, or director of private corporation or unincorporated association to assert personal privilege against self-incrimination with respect to production of corporate books or records.
52 A.L.R.3d 636.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1732 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 30, 31, 161 et seq. (stockholders’ derivative actions).

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 965 et seq.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation by incorporators, see § 79-4-14.01.

Incorporators under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-135.

The 2016 amendment added (b)(6).

Articles of incorporation must set forth certain information regarding shares that the corporation is authorized to issue, see § 79-4-6.01.

Amendment of articles of incorporation generally, see §§ 79-4-10.01 et seq.

Restatement of articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-10.07.

Expiration of corporation’s period of duration stated in its articles of incorporation as ground for administrative dissolution, see § 79-4-14.20.

Copy of articles or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect to be maintained at corporation’s principal office, see § 79-4-16.01.

Charter restriction prohibiting the transfer of stock of a family corporation without consent of the shareholders was legitimate and reasonable insofar as it prohibited transfers of stock outside the family, but the prohibition against transfers within the family without the permission of each shareholder was unduly restrictive in that it served no reasonable purpose and was permissive to one dissenting shareholder thwarting the corporate business to the frustration of other shareholders by arbitrarily withholding consent, there being no charter or other provision for relief from such situation. Fayard v. Fayard, 293 So. 2d 421, 1974 Miss. LEXIS 1789 (Miss. 1974).

Evidence that a husband and wife, as majority stockholders, organized a corporation only a few days before the institution of an action against the husband, and the charter had neither been published in a newspaper nor recorded in the office of the chancery clerk, and no report of the corporation’s organization had been made to the secretary of state, and the husband and wife, after filing of the suit, transferred certain shares of stock to another as collateral for a loan, showed that the organization of the corporation was intended as a stand-by device to put the husband’s property beyond execution without the necessary good faith for the existence of a de facto corporation, so that the lien of the judgment creditor was superior to the corporation’s claim of ownership to an automobile, which had been transferred to it by the husband in exchange for stock shortly before the commencement of the suit. United Sewing Machine Distributors, Inc. v. Calhoun, 231 Miss. 390, 95 So. 2d 453, 1957 Miss. LEXIS 524 (Miss. 1957).

Change of corporation’s domicile from place stated in its charter by stockholders’ resolution, as authorized by charter, held matter of internal management not requiring charter amendment, in absence of statutory prohibition. Estes v. Bank of Walnut Grove, 172 Miss. 499, 159 So. 104, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 107 (Miss. 1935).

Chancery court of county from which domestic corporation, garnished as debtor of foreign bank in attachment suit against latter, moved its property, office, and place of stockholders’ meeting, as permitted by its charter, before issuance of process for it to sheriff of such county, had no territorial jurisdiction of such bank or garnishee. Estes v. Bank of Walnut Grove, 172 Miss. 499, 159 So. 104, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 107 (Miss. 1935).

Corporation advertising that it will make loans where its funds and its method of doing business made it impossible for it to comply with its promise, held to show an intention to defraud justifying revocation of its charter or an injunction against its doing business. Jackson Loan & Trust Co. v. State, 101 Miss. 440, 56 So. 293, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 93 (Miss. 1911).

The capital stock of a corporation, the charter not providing otherwise, may be paid for in property at its actual value. Ferguson v. Oxford Mercantile Co., 78 Miss. 65, 27 So. 877, 1900 Miss. LEXIS 68 (Miss. 1900).

Applicability of statutes regulating sale of assets or property of corporation as affected by purpose or character of corporation.
9 A.L.R.2d 1306.

Construction and effect of corporate articles, charter, or bylaws limiting duration or maturity of indebtedness. 55 A.L.R.2d 949.

Corporation: validity of charter provision for non-voting common stock.
52 A.L.R.3d 1131.

Incorporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-139.

This section [Code 1942, § 5343] does not require corporation authorized to do business by compliance with former statute to refile its charter and pay fees again. Power v. Calvert Mortg. Co., 112 Miss. 319, 73 So. 51, 1916 Miss. LEXIS 112 (Miss. 1916).

4 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 1, Doing Business.

Emergency bylaws, see § 79-4-2.07.

Emergency bylaws, see § 79-4-2.07.

Amendment of bylaws, see §§ 79-4-10.20 et seq.

Bylaws under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-145.

Conflict of laws as to validity and effect of corporate bylaw. 27 A.L.R.2d 435.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors.
3 A.L.R.3d 623.

Bylaws, generally, see § 79-4-2.06.

Emergency bylaws under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-147.